Massachusetts, session 194th, H1366.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24 of Chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding at the end of the first paragraph the following sentence:
In developing the biennial report, the center shall seek input from nurses who provide
continuous skilled nursing care and patients and family members of patients that receive
continuous skilled nursing care and include in the report information about direct care
experiences.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 83. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and subject to
appropriation, the executive office of health and human services shall increase the budget for
continuous skilled nursing care, as defined in 101 CMR 361 and 130 CMR 403.402, by an
amount that ensures:
of 3

(1) At least 75 percent of continuous skilled nursing hours authorized by MassHealth are
filled on or before July 1, 2025;
(2) At least 80 percent of continuous skilled nursing hours authorized by MassHealth are
filled on or before July 1, 2026; and
(3) At least 85 percent of continuous skilled nursing hours authorized by MassHealth are
filled on or before July 1, 2027, and shall remain at 85 percent or above thereafter.
(b) The executive office of health and human services may require any portion of the
budget increases provided for in this section to be used exclusively to increase the wage payment
rate of nurses providing continuous skilled nursing care.
(c) To satisfy the requirements in subsection (a), the executive office of health and human
services shall require MassHealth to submit an annual report no later than January 1 that:
(1) demonstrates that MassHealth has not changed its authorization criteria for
continuous skilled nursing services in a way that is more restrictive and results in a reduction in
the amount of authorized hours that would have been authorized previously; and
(2) includes the following information from the immediately preceding calendar year: (i)
the number of filled and unfilled continuous skilled nursing hours authorized by MassHealth; (ii)
the number of appeals received by MassHealth for the denial or modification of continuous
skilled nursing hours and the number of patients that filed an appeal; (iii) the number of patients
that received a reduction in the amount of authorized continuous skilled nursing hours; and (iv)
the number of authorized continuous skilled nursing hours reduced from the immediately
preceding calendar year, if any.
of 3

(d) The executive office of health and human services, in collaboration with MassHealth
and after consultation with the Massachusetts Pediatric Nursing Care Campaign, shall
promulgate regulations to implement this section.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit filling 85 percent of the
continuous skilled nursing hours authorized by MassHealth prior to July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the office of
Medicaid shall review the wage payment rates established by home health agencies that provide
continuous skilled nursing care, as defined in 101 CMR 361.00 and 130 CMR 403.402, for the
providers of those services. The office shall provide: (i) an aggregated overview of the wage
payment rates paid by home health agencies to staff or contracted nurses providing continuous
skilled nursing care, including any increases in said wage rates resulting from increases in
Medicaid rates paid to home health agencies for continuous skilled nursing care in state fiscal
years 2022, 2023 and 2024; (ii) an aggregated breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the
acuity level of patients receiving continuous skilled nursing care; (iii) an aggregated breakdown
of said wage rates as applied to the licensure level of the providers of continuous skilled nursing
care; and (iv) recommendations on criteria to be included in any future reporting by home health
agencies receiving an increase of continuous skilled nursing care rates provided by the office.
The office shall provide this report not later than March 1, 2027 to the clerks of the senate and
house of representatives, the joint committee on health care financing and the senate and house
committees on ways and means. Home health agencies providing continuous skilled nursing care
shall provide all information and documentation requested by the office of Medicaid to compile
the required report under this section.
of 3